Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 13 Displaced Worker Education and Training

§ 27-13-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Demand occupation” means an occupation in a labor market area in which the director determines that work opportunities are available and that there is not a surplus of qualified applicants;

“Director” means the director of the division;

“Displaced workers” means:

Those workers unemployed due to plant closures or substantial plant layoffs;

Workers eligible for retraining under the federal trade adjustment assistance act;

Unemployed workers otherwise affected by economic or industrial changes which have resulted in loss or reduction of their employment opportunities, as determined by the director.

“Division” means the department of workforce services;

“Local education or training agency” means:

A board of trustees of a school district;

A public or private educational institution or agency having administrative control and direction of a vocational education program;

A board of a community college district; or

A board of cooperative educational services.

“Program” means:

“Occupational transfer programs and retraining services” including:

Services necessary to assist displaced workers in identifying those skills they possess which are transferable to other related demand occupations;

Education and training activities necessary to prepare displaced workers for occupations to which their preexisting skills are readily transferable.

“Education and training program” including a course or program of instruction which:

Relates to an occupation or skill for which there are, or are expected to be in the immediate future, reasonable employment opportunities in the labor market area or areas in the state in which the participating individual intends to seek work and for which there is not a surplus of workers with requisite skills in that area, as determined by the director;

Ordinarily can be completed within one (1) year and is intended for the primary purpose of enabling participants to obtain immediate employment in a demand occupation. The training shall not be primarily intended to meet the requirements of any degree from a college, community college or university.

“This act” means W.S.

27-13-101

through

27-13-103

.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 128, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2010, ch. 65, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the state planning coordinator, see §

9-1-207

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(iv), substituted “department of workforce services” for “department of employment.”

Editor's notes. —

The reference to the federal trade adjustment assistance act, in subsection (a)(iii)(B), apparently means Title II of the Trade Act of 1974, which relates to relief from injury caused by import competition. See 19 U.S.C. § 2271 et seq.

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Garl, 2001 WY 59, 26 P.3d 1029,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2001).

§ 27-13-102.
Powers and duties; rules and regulations.

The division shall, in conjunction with the department of education, the business council, the department of workforce services, the workforce development council, the University of Wyoming and the community college commission, establish and maintain a plan to implement the occupational transfer and retraining programs and services for displaced workers created under this act. The plan shall designate:

Responsibilities of state agencies in administering this act;

Procedures for coordination between the state and local agencies and existing employment, training, education and other occupationally related activities and resources in the state;

Procedures to encourage involvement on the part of labor, management, local government and local education and training agencies in the establishment, operation and ongoing direction of programs to assist displaced workers.

The division shall:

Identify statutes, rules and regulations which inhibit the implementation of programs under this act; and

Recommend modifications to or waivers of statutes, rules and regulations to permit design of cost-effective programs under this act;

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 7, § 3.

The director may enter into contracts and agreements with local education or training agencies to implement this act.

The governor, in consultation with the director, may promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to implement this act.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 128, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2010, ch. 65, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2008 amendment,

deleted “joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the” following “Annually report to the” in (b)(iii).

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “business council, the department of employment, the workforce development council” for “department of economic planning and development, the office of the commissioner of labor, the employment security commission.”

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014,
in (b)(i), added “and” at the end; and repealed former (b)(iii), which read: “Annually report to the joint appropriations interim committee regarding programs under this act.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act”, referred to in this section, see § 27-13-101(a)(vii).

§ 27-13-103.
Programs; funding.

Programs established under this act shall be funded to the maximum extent feasible through existing federal, state and local resources, both public and private. The plan required under W.S. 27-13-102(a) shall include an estimate of funds available from sources other than from the state.

The division may, to the extent funded by the legislature, establish and maintain programs under this act.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 128, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act”, referred to in this section, see § 27-13-101(a)(vii).